Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 4
FOREST PRODUCTS

23-31-401. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Forest product" means any natural part of any plant including, but not limited to, firewood, logs, trees, evergreen boughs, and transplants in commercial quantities.

"Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, firm, or association.

"Transplant" means any live plant that has been excavated and moved for the purpose of planting in a different location.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 537, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-401 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-402. Owner's permission required - when.

It is unlawful for any person to harvest and remove any forest product on land of another without first securing written permission from the owner of the land or the owner of the growth thereon, or his or her authorized agent. Only one permit shall be required of persons working in a crew.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 537, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-402 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-403. Proof of ownership required - when.

It is unlawful for any person to transport or possess any forest product in the state of Colorado without proof of ownership. Said proof of ownership shall be signed by the person transferring possession of said forest products and shall contain the date of the transfer of possession, the name and address of the transferee, the location at which the forest products were obtained, and the quantity of forest product transferred. Such proof of ownership may consist of one or more of the following:

A permit, contract, or other writing issued by the landowner or proper state or federal agencies;

A bill of sale or sales receipt showing title thereto;

A log or product load receipt or inventory;

A ticket issued by the seller authorizing removal of forest products; or

Any written statement by a person transporting forest products harvested or removed from property owned by such person.

Any person who transports or possesses any forest product intended for resale shall, upon request of any sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, town marshal, Colorado state patrol officer, parks and recreation officer, Colorado wildlife officer, or an agent of the Colorado bureau of investigation, exhibit valid proof of ownership.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 537, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-403 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-404. Violation - penalty - defense.

Any person who violates any provision of this part 4 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine equal to twice the retail value of the forest products involved.

Proof of ownership shall be an affirmative defense.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 538, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-404 as it existed prior to 2007.